csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: minongwaamookan
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: minongwaamookeg
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: minongwaamookang
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: minongwaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: minongwaangegon
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: minongwaanziidaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: minongwaamin
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [minongwaamog,minongwaamok]
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: minongwaandaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziidogena',minongwaanziidogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziidogenag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziidogenan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziidog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: minongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamodogena',minongwaamowidogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [minongwaamowidogenag,minongwaamodogenag]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [minongwaamowidogenan,minongwaamodogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [minongwaamowidog,minongwaamodog]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: minongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamogwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niminongwaanzii,niminongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giminongwaanzii,giminongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziiwa',minongwaanziiwan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziiwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [minongwaanzii,minongwaanziin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: minongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamoo',minongwaamoon]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamoog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaamoon
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: minongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giminongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaanziibanii',minongwaanziibaniin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziibaniig
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziibaniin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: minongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giminongwaamimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [minongwaamoobanii',minongwaamoobaniin]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamoobaniig
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaamoobaniin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamooban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: minongwaamimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziiwegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: minongwaanziiwaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: minongwaanziiwangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: minongwaanziiwiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: minongwaamowaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: minongwaamowegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: minongwaamowanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: minongwaamowaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: minongwaamowangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: minongwaamowiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziiwegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: minongwaanziiwaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: minongwaanziiwangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: minongwaanziiwiingibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: minongwaamowaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: minongwaamowegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: minongwaamowambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: minongwaamowaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: minongwaamowangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: minongwaamowiingibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziwaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziweg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanzigwaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanzig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: minongwaanziwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: minongwaanziwang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: minongwaanzing
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: minongwaamaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: minongwaameg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: minongwaaman
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaad
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: minongwaamaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: minongwaamang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: minongwaaming
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziwaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziwegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziwamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanzigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanzigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: minongwaanziwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: minongwaanziwangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: minongwaanzingiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: minongwaamaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: minongwaamegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: minongwaamamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaapan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: minongwaamaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: minongwaamangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: minongwaamingiban
